California statutes. Public Resources Code
(2) Increased energy efficiency in buildings, appliances, lighting, and other applications beyond applicable standards, and that benefit electric utility customers.

(3) Advanced electricity generation technologies that exceed applicable standards to increase reductions in greenhouse gas emissions from electricity generation, and that benefit electric utility customers.

(4) Advanced electricity technologies that reduce or eliminate consumption of water or other finite resources, increase use of renewable energy resources, or improve transmission or distribution of electricity generated from renewable energy resources.

(c) To achieve the goals established in subdivision (b), the commission shall adopt a portfolio approach for the program that does all of the following:

(1) Effectively balances the risks, benefits, and time horizons for various activities and investments that will provide tangible energy or environmental benefits for California electricity customers.

(2) Emphasizes innovative energy supply and end use technologies, focusing on their reliability, affordability, and environmental attributes.

(3) Includes projects that have the potential to enhance transmission and distribution capabilities.

(4) Includes projects that have the potential to enhance the reliability, peaking power, and storage capabilities of renewable energy.

(5) Demonstrates a balance of benefits to all sectors that contribute to the funding under Section 399.8 of the Public Utilities Code.

(6) Addresses key technical and scientific barriers.

(7) Demonstrates a balance between short-term, mid-term, and long-term potential.

(8) Ensures that prior, current, and future research not be unnecessarily duplicated.

(9) Provides for the future market utilization of projects funded through the program.

(10) Ensures an open project selection process and encourages the awarding of research funding for a diverse type of research as well as a diverse award recipient base and equally considers research proposals from the public and private sectors.

(11) Coordinates with other related research programs.

(d) The term “award,” as used in this chapter, may include, but is not limited to, contracts, grants, interagency agreements, loans, and other financial agreements designed to fund public interest research, demonstration, and development projects or programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 512, Sec. 2.   Effective September 27, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.2.

(a) To ensure the efficient implementation and administration of the Public Interest Research, Development, and Demonstration Program, the commission shall do both of the following:

(1) Develop procedures for the solicitation of award applications for project or program funding, and to ensure efficient program management.

(2) Evaluate and select programs and projects, based on merit, that will be funded under the program.

(b) The commission shall adopt regulations to implement the program, in accordance with the following procedures:

(1) Prepare a preliminary text of the proposed regulation and provide a copy of the preliminary text to any person requesting a copy.

(2) Provide public notice of the proposed regulation to any person who has requested notice of the regulations prepared by the commission. The notice shall contain all of the following:

(A) A clear overview explaining the proposed regulation.

(B) Instructions on how to obtain a copy of the proposed regulations.

(C) A statement that if a public hearing is not scheduled for the purpose of reviewing a proposed regulation, any person may request, not later than 15 days prior to the close of the written comment period, a public hearing conducted in accordance with commission procedures.

(3) Accept written public comments for 30 calendar days after providing the notice required in paragraph (2).

(4) Certify that all written comments were read and considered by the commission.

(5) Place all written comments in a record that includes copies of any written factual support used in developing the proposed regulation, including written reports and copies of any transcripts or minutes in connection with any public hearings on the adoption of the regulation. The record shall be open to public inspection and available to the courts.

(6) Provide public notice of any substantial revision of the proposed regulation at least 15 days prior to the expiration of the deadline for public comments and comment period using the procedures provided in paragraph (2).

(7) Conduct public hearings, if a hearing is requested by an interested party, that shall be conducted in accordance with commission procedures.

(8) Adopt any proposed regulation at a regularly scheduled and noticed meeting of the commission. The regulation shall become effective immediately unless otherwise provided by the commission.

(9) Publish any adopted regulation in a manner that makes copies of the regulation easily available to the public. Any adopted regulation shall also be made available on the Internet. The commission shall transmit a copy of an adopted regulation to the Office of Administrative Law for publication, or, if the commission determines that printing the regulation is impractical, an appropriate reference as to where a copy of the regulation may be obtained.

(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this subdivision provides an interim exception from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code for regulations required to implement Sections 25620.1 and 25620.2 that are adopted under the procedures specified in this subdivision.

(11) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2012, unless a later enacted statute deletes or extends that date. However, after January 1, 2012, the commission is not required to repeat any procedural step in adopting a regulation that has been completed before January 1, 2012, using the procedures specified in this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 512, Sec. 3.   Effective September 27, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.3.

(a) The commission may, consistent with the requirements of this chapter, provide awards to any individual or entity for planning, implementation, and administration of projects or programs selected pursuant to Section 25620.5.

(b) The commission may provide an award to a project or program that includes a group of related projects, or to a party who aggregates projects that directly benefit from the award.

(c) The commission may establish multiparty agreements. In a multiparty agreement, the commission may be a signatory to a common agreement among two or more parties. These agreements include, but are not limited to, cofunding, leveraged research, collaborations, and membership arrangements. If the commission enters into these agreements, it shall be a party to these agreements and may share in the roles, responsibilities, risks, investments, and results.

(d) The commission may issue awards that include the ability to make advance payments to prime contractors, to enable them to make advance payments to a subcontractor that is a federal agency, national laboratory, or state entity, on the condition that the subcontract is binding and enforceable and includes specific performance milestones.

(e) The commission may issue awards that include the ability to assign tasks on a work authorization basis.

(f) Prior to making any award pursuant to this chapter for a research, development, or demonstration program or project, the commission shall identify the expected costs and any qualitative or quantitative benefits of the proposed program or project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 515, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.4.

(a) To the extent that intellectual property is developed under this chapter, an equitable share of rights in the intellectual property or in the benefits derived therefrom shall accrue to the State of California.

(b) The commission may determine what share, if any, of the intellectual property, or the benefits derived therefrom, shall accrue to the state. The commission may negotiate sharing mechanisms for intellectual property or benefits with award recipients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 905, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.5.

(a) The commission may solicit applications for awards, using a sealed competitive bid, competitive negotiation process, commission-issued intradepartmental master agreement, the methods for selection of professional services firms set forth in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code, interagency agreement, single source, or sole source method. When scoring teams are convened to review and score proposals, the scoring teams may include persons not employed by the commission, as long as employees of the state constitute no less than 50 percent of the membership of the scoring team. A person participating on a scoring team may not have any conflict of interest with respect to the proposal before the scoring team.

(b) A sealed bid method may be used when goods and services to be acquired can be described with sufficient specificity so that bids can be evaluated against specifications and criteria set forth in the solicitation for bids.

(c) The commission may use a competitive negotiation process in any of the following circumstances:

(1) Whenever the desired award is not for a fixed price.

(2) Whenever project specifications cannot be drafted in sufficient detail so as to be applicable to a sealed competitive bid.

(3) Whenever there is a need to compare the different price, quality, and structural factors of the bids submitted.

(4) Whenever there is a need to afford bidders an opportunity to revise their proposals.

(5) Whenever oral or written discussions with bidders concerning the technical and price aspects of their proposals will provide better results to the state.

(6) Whenever the price of the award is not the determining factor.

(d) The commission may establish interagency agreements.

(e) The commission may provide awards on a single source basis by choosing from among two or more parties or by soliciting multiple applications from parties capable of supplying or providing similar goods or services. The cost to the state shall be reasonable and the commission may only enter into a single source agreement with a particular party if the commission determines that it is in the state’s best interests.

(f) The commission, in accordance with subdivision (g) and in consultation with the Department of General Services, may provide awards on a sole source basis when the cost to the state is reasonable and the commission makes any of the following determinations:

(1) The proposal was unsolicited and meets the evaluation criteria of this chapter.

(2) The expertise, service, or product is unique.

(3) A competitive solicitation would frustrate obtaining necessary information, goods, or services in a timely manner.

(4) The award funds the next phase of a multiphased proposal and the existing agreement is being satisfactorily performed.

(5) When it is determined by the commission to be in the best interests of the state.

(g) The commission may not use a sole source basis for an award pursuant to subdivision (f), unless both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The commission, at least 60 days prior to taking an action pursuant to subdivision (f), notifies the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the relevant policy committees in both houses of the Legislature, in writing, of its intent to take the proposed action.

(2) The Joint Legislative Budget Committee either approves or does not disapprove the proposed action within 60 days from the date of notification required by paragraph (1).

(h) The commission shall give priority to California-based entities in making awards pursuant to this chapter.

(i) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held to be invalid, that invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

For purposes of this Section and Section 25620, “California-based entity” means either of the following:

A corporation or other business form organized for the transaction of business that has its headquarters in California and manufactures in California the product that qualifies for the incentive or award, or a corporation or other business form organized for the transaction of business that has an office for the transaction of business in California and substantially manufactures in California the product that qualifies for the incentive or award, or substantially develops within California the research that qualifies for the incentive or award, as determined by the agency issuing the incentive or award.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 537, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.6.

The commission, in consultation with the Department of General Services, may purchase insurance coverage necessary to implement an award. Funding for the purchase of insurance may be made from money in the Public Interest Research, Development, and Demonstration Fund created pursuant to Section 384 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 905, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.7.

(a) The commission may contract for, or through interagency agreement obtain, technical, scientific, or administrative services or expertise from one or more entities, to support the program. Funding for this purpose shall be made from money in the Public Interest Research, Development, and Demonstration Fund.

(b) The commission may select the services or expertise described in subdivision (a), pursuant to Section 25620.5. In the event that contracts or interagency agreements have been made to multiple entities and their subcontractors for similar purposes, the commission may select from among those entities the particular expertise needed for a specified type of work. Selection of the particular expertise may be based solely on a review of qualifications, including the specific expertise required, availability of the expertise, or access to a resource of special relevance to the work, including, but not limited to, a database, model, technical facility, or a collaborative or institutional affiliation that will expedite the quality and performance of the work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 515, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.8.

(a) The commission shall prepare and submit to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee an annual report, not later than October 31 of each year, that
 includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) Recommendations
 for improvements in the program.

(2) A summary of the Public Interest Research, Development, and Demonstration Program’s impacts and benefits.

(3) A summary of how funding is allocated to each of the Public Interest Research, Development, and Demonstration Program’s natural gas investment areas.

(4) A description of successful or promising projects funded in each of the Public Interest Research, Development, and Demonstration Program’s
 natural gas investment areas.

(5) A summary of expected Public Interest Research, Development, and Demonstration Program funding initiatives and activities over the next year.

(6) Information on Public Interest Research, Development, and Demonstration Program-approved project budgets and benefits, all active projects, and recently completed projects.

(7) A description of any recent changes to the Public Interest Research, Development, and Demonstration Program’s spending guidelines or eligible projects.

(b) As part of each annual report submitted pursuant to this section, the commission may include information that has been previously provided in reports submitted to the Public Utilities Commission.

(c) The commission shall establish procedures for protecting confidential or proprietary information and shall consult with all interested parties in the preparation of
 each annual report submitted pursuant to this section.

(d) A report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 71.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.9.

For a project related to the deployment of a microgrid, a recipient of moneys awarded pursuant to this chapter shall not expend those moneys for the purchase of diesel generators, including diesel backup generators.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 476, Sec. 1.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.11.

(a) The commission shall regularly convene an advisory board that shall make recommendations to guide the commission’s selection of programs and projects to be funded under this chapter. The advisory board shall include as appropriate, but not be limited to, representatives from the Public Utilities Commission, consumer organizations, environmental organizations, and electrical corporations subject to the funding requirements of Section 381 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) Three members of the Senate, appointed by the Senate President Pro Tempore, and three members of the Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, may meet with the advisory board and participate in its activities to the extent that such participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 512, Sec. 7.   Effective September 27, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.15.

(a) In order to ensure that prudent investments in research, development, and demonstration of energy efficient technologies continue to produce substantial economic, environmental, public health, and reliability benefits, it is the policy of the state and the intent of the Legislature that funds made available, upon appropriation, for energy related public interest research, development, and demonstration programs shall be used to advance science or technology that is not adequately provided by competitive and regulated markets.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, money collected for public interest research, development, and demonstration pursuant to Section 399.8 of the Public Utilities Code shall be transferred to the Public Interest Research, Development, and Demonstration Fund. Money collected between January 1, 2007, and January 1, 2012, shall be used for the purposes specified in this chapter.

(c) In lieu of the Public Utilities Commission retaining funds authorized pursuant to Section 381 of the Public Utilities Code for investments made by electrical corporations in public interest research, development, and demonstration projects for transmission and distribution functions, up to 10 percent of the funds transferred to the commission pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be awarded to electrical corporations for public interest research, development, and demonstration projects for transmission and distribution functions consistent with the policies and subject to the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 512, Sec. 8.   Effective September 27, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.2. Climate Innovation Program [25625. - 25625.5.]

25625.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Climate Innovation Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 11.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25625.1.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply: 

(a) “California-headquartered company” means a corporation or other business form organized for the transaction of business that has its headquarters in California. For multinational corporations, the term means the United States-based headquarters is in California. For purposes of this definition, headquarters means the location where the corporation’s executive management and key managerial and support staff are located, and from where the corporation is managed.

(b) “Climate Innovation Program” means the activities described in this chapter.

(c) “Financial incentive”
 includes, but is not limited to, a contract, grant, or other appropriate funding measure.

(d) (1) “Liquidity Event” means an event during the term of a financial incentive under this program, or within 10 years after the financial incentive ends for any reason, in which the recipient has an Initial Public Offering.

(2) If the recipient has a change in ownership that results in a greater than 50- percent change in the company’s capitalization table the commission, at its sole discretion, may determine that the particular change in ownership constitutes a “Liquidity Event”. The change in ownership that results in greater than 50-percent change in the company’s capitalization table includes both single-event changes or cumulative changes greater than 50-percent.

(3) In the case of a recipient whose
 stock is publicly traded before receiving the financial incentive, the commission may determine alternate conditions that would constitute a “liquidity event.”

(e) “Regenerative agriculture” means agricultural practices that focus on the health of the ecological system as a whole and not solely on high-production yields.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 11.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25625.2.

(a) The commission shall establish and administer the Climate Innovation Program to provide financial incentives to California-headquartered companies for developing and commercializing technologies that provide technological advancements that either help California meet its greenhouse gas reduction targets and achieve its climate goals on an accelerated timeline and at a lower cost, or enable the state to be more resilient to the impacts of climate change such as drought and wildfire.

(b) In administering the Climate Innovation Program, the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Award funds to California-headquartered companies.

(2) (A) Award funds to research teams consisting of California-headquartered companies working jointly with California public university students, faculty, or researchers at a University of California or a California State University facility, including innovation hubs, Innovation and Entrepreneurship Centers, or California Institutes for Sciences and Innovation, as provided through a memorandum of understanding or contract between the California-headquartered company and these public entities.

(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), eligible applicants may include corporations or other business entities that enter into written agreements with the commission that the company will relocate its headquarters to California and comply with the requirements of this chapter if granted an incentive, from a state that has enacted a law that does any of the following:

(i) Voids or repeals, or has the effect of voiding or repealing, existing state protections against discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

(ii) Authorizes or requires discrimination against same-sex couples or their families, or discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

(iii) Creates an exemption to antidiscrimination laws in order to permit discrimination against same-sex couples or their families, or permit discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

(iv) Denies or interferes with, or has the effect of denying or interfering with, a woman’s right to choose to bear a child or to choose and obtain an abortion, as
 provided by Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Conduct a stakeholder-driven process to identify and prioritize investments in technological advancements for the Climate Innovation Program that:

(A) Provide the greatest potential benefits to the state’s climate goals, including, but not limited to, zero-emission transportation, lithium processing, manufacturing, and recovery, regenerative agriculture, and drought and wildfire prevention.

(B) Are not sufficiently addressed by other funding programs.

(C) May leverage and attract significant federal funding to California.

(4) Negotiate with an eligible
 applicant the terms and conditions of proposed written agreements that provide the financial incentives allowed pursuant to this chapter. The written agreement may include such terms and conditions as required by the commission, including, but not limited to, requiring repayment of some or all of the financial incentive over a period of time determined in the written agreement.

(5) Provide the negotiated written agreement to the commission for its approval at a duly noticed public meeting held in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), including the proposed terms and conditions from paragraph (4).

(6) Post on its internet website all of the following information:

(A) The name of each
 applicant granted a financial incentive under this chapter.

(B) The estimated amount of the investment by each applicant.

(C) The estimated number of jobs created or retained.

(D) The amount of the financial incentive granted to the funding recipient.

(E) The amount of the financial incentive recaptured from the funding recipient, if applicable.

(7) (A) Include a term requiring the recipient, if there is a liquidity event, to repay the full amount of the financial incentive plus an additional percentage. The additional percentage shall be set at 20 percent. The commission and recipient may enter into a repayment plan for the recipient to make the repayment over time
 instead of the recipient making a one-time payment. The percentage may be increased to the extent the recipient fails to meet the performance metrics it agrees upon with the commission.

(B) Each financial incentive shall include performance metrics, including jobs created and environmental benefits, and may include other metrics, including, but not limited to, follow-on investment, patents filed, and estimated benefits to California based on a reasonable estimate of market adoption.

(C) The commission shall exempt from the repayment term in subparagraph (A) a “producer,” as defined in Section 47002 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, that pays a lithium extraction excise tax pursuant to Section 47010 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(D) The commission may exempt projects from the repayment term in subparagraph (A) if
 it is prohibited by a recipient’s existing or announced federal award.

(8) (A) Establish a process for selecting and overseeing projects funded through the Climate Innovation Program to ensure financial incentives are used to advance technologies that help meet the state’s climate goals.

(B) The process described in subparagraph (A) shall include developing criteria for awarding financial incentives and providing oversight over funded projects.

(9) Require each recipient to report on the number of jobs created and the project’s measurable environmental benefits. The commission may require each recipient to report on other specific, measurable performance metrics, including, but not limited to, follow-on investment, patents filed, and estimated benefits to California based on a reasonable
 estimate of market adoption, as determined by the commission.

(10) Maintain an online database that includes, but is not limited to, a brief description of each project for which funding was awarded, including the name of the recipient, the amount of the award, and the outcomes of the funded project.

(11) (A) Solicit applicants and award financial incentives using a competitive award process. The commission may noncompetitively award follow-on financial incentives to awardees of a prior competitive award process.

(B) The commission may use the competitive award process of another organization to award funds or provide follow-on funding for a company previously selected through a competitive process for the purpose of attracting significant federal or private funding for the projects or for the
 purpose of accelerating the delivery of program benefits.

(C) Notwithstanding any other law, in its discretion, advance up to 25 percent of the financial incentive awarded pursuant to this chapter, in a manner consistent with Section 11019 of the Government Code.

(12) (A) Without limiting any other rights and remedies available to the commission, the commission may include the following repayment term:
“Without limiting any of its other remedies, the commission may, for recipient’s noncompliance of any financial incentive requirement, withhold future payments, demand and be entitled to repayment of past reimbursements, or suspend or terminate this financial incentive. The tasks in the scope of work are not severable, and completion of all of them is material to this financial
 incentive. Another material aspect of this financial incentive is that the recipient shall be a California-headquartered company for the entire term of the financial incentive and an additional 10 years. Thus, the commission, without limiting its other remedies, is entitled to repayment of all funds paid to recipient if the recipient does not timely complete all tasks in the scope of work or is not a California-headquartered company at any time during the financial incentive period and an additional 10 years.”
(B) If both the repayment term described in subparagraph (A) and the repayment term in paragraph (4) apply, the repayment term of paragraph (4) has priority, but the repayment term of subparagraph (A) also applies.

(C) The commission may exempt projects from the repayment term described in subparagraph (A) if it is prohibited by a
 recipient’s existing or announced federal award.

(13) Include a term requiring all funds awarded in the financial incentive to be spent on projects located in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 11.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25625.3.

The commission may propose contingent financial incentives under the Climate Innovation Program to corporations or other business forms organized for the transaction of business that are not California-headquartered companies contingent upon a requirement that the entity become a California-headquartered company before the commission executes the financial incentive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 11.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25625.4.

Recipients of a financial incentive awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be a California-headquartered company for the entire term of the financial incentive and for 10 years after the financial incentive ends.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 11.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25625.5.

To support the activities of this chapter, the commission may noncompetitively obtain assistance for technical, scientific, or administrative services or expertise, including, but not limited to, through contract or interagency agreement, to help with the commission’s implementation of the Climate Innovation Program or to provide assistance to project applicants for technical, scientific, or administrative services or expertise. Up to 10 percent of programs funds shall be used for this administrative purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 11.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.3. Small Business Energy Technology Loan Program [25630. - 25630.]

25630.

(a) The commission shall establish a small business energy assistance low-interest revolving loan program to fund the purchase of equipment for alternative technology energy projects for California’s small businesses.

(b) Loan repayments, interest, and royalties shall be deposited in the Energy Technologies Research, Development, and Demonstration Account. The interest rate shall be based on surveys of existing financial markets and at rates not lower than the Pooled Money Investment Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 93.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.4. Long-Duration Energy Storage Program [25640. - 25645.]

25640.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Energy storage system” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2835 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) “Thermal energy storage” means the storage of thermal energy for direct use for heating or cooling at a later time in a manner that avoids the need to use electricity at that later time.

(c) “Financial incentive” includes a contract, grant, loan, rebate, block grant, or other appropriate funding mechanism.

(d) “Under-resourced community” has the same meaning
 as defined in Section 71130.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 395, Sec. 2.   (AB 1280)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25641.

(a) The commission shall establish and implement the Long-Duration Energy Storage Program to provide financial incentives for eligible projects, located at eligible storage facilities, that have power ratings of at least one megawatt and are capable of reaching a target of at least eight hours of continuous discharge of electricity at that power rating in order to deploy innovative energy storage systems to the electrical grid for purposes of providing critical capacity and grid services.

(b) The commission shall establish and implement an Industrial Facilities Thermal Energy Storage Program within the Long-Duration Energy Storage Program to provide financial incentives for
 eligible projects located at eligible facilities to decarbonize industrial facilities’ use of heat and power. The commission may establish project and industrial facility guidelines for the purposes of this section that support the broader transformation of industrial facilities to ensure program resources support high-road jobs, community benefits, and the transition from fossil fuels to clean energy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 395, Sec. 3.   (AB 1280)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25642.

(a) The commission may establish project and storage facility eligibility guidelines for purposes of this chapter.

(b) Any eligibility guidelines established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be consistent with both of the following requirements:

(1) “Eligible storage facility” shall include, but not be limited to, an energy storage system that is interconnected to the electrical grid in California or to a California balancing authority.

(2) (A) “Eligible project” shall include, but not be limited to, an eligible storage facility that includes any of the
 following:

(i) Compressed air or liquid air technologies.

(ii) Flow batteries, advanced chemistry batteries, or mechanical energy storage.

(iii) Thermal energy storage or aqueous battery systems.

(iv) A hydrogen demonstration project.

(B) “Eligible project” shall not include a pumped storage project or lithium-ion-based storage technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 395, Sec. 4.   (AB 1280)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25643.

In implementing the Long-Duration Energy Storage Program, the commission may do all of the following:

(a) In addition to any other authorized method of providing moneys to participants in the Long-Duration Energy Storage Program, use financial incentives.

(b) Award Long-Duration Energy Storage Program moneys for technical assistance, including, but not limited to, providing outreach to eligible industries, identifying promising technologies, assessing market conditions needed to accelerate commercial traction of the technology, assisting with technical review of proposals and deliverables, identifying opportunities that provide significant benefits to the electrical grid, and performing benefits
 analysis. The commission may contract for, or through interagency agreement obtain, technical, scientific, and administrative services and expertise from one or more entities to support the Long-Duration Energy Storage Program.

(c) Adopt guidelines or other standards at a business meeting for the Long-Duration Energy Storage Program. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the adoption of the guidelines or other standards adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, noncompetitively award Long-Duration Energy Storage Program moneys through an amendment to, or a new agreement with a party to or recipient of, contracts or grants from California governmental entities or a federal agency if the recipient
 has received funding for the original project through a competitive bid process from a California governmental entity or federal agency and the awarding of those moneys is consistent with the stated goals and criteria of the Long-Duration Energy Storage Program.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, noncompetitively award Long-Duration Energy Storage Program moneys to a governmental entity, national laboratory, entity contracted by the federal government to operate a national laboratory, or foundation established to serve the University of California or California State University.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, noncompetitively award Long-Duration Energy Storage Program moneys to any entity if the cost to the state is reasonable and the commission makes any of the following determinations:

(A) The expertise,
 service, or product is unique.

(B) A competitive solicitation would frustrate the obtainment of necessary information, goods, or services in a timely manner.

(C) The moneys to be awarded would fund the next phase of a multiphased project, the multiphased project was funded through competitively awarded agreement, and the entity satisfactorily performed the competitively awarded agreement.

(D) It is in the best interests of the state to do so.

(E) The entity will use the moneys as matching funds for federally awarded moneys.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, in its discretion, advance up to 25 percent of the Long-Duration Energy Storage Program moneys awarded pursuant to this
 chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 5.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25644.
